Missouri, session 2026, SB942.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 304, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 304.173, to read as
follows:
304.173. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Construction materials", materials intended for
use in a construction project, including, but not limited
to, asphalt, concrete, and aggregates;
(2) "Interstate system", that portion of the national
system of interstate highways located within the boundaries
of Missouri, as officially designated or may be hereafter
designated by the state highways and transportation
commission with the approval of the Secretary of
Transportation, pursuant to Title 23, United States Code, as
amended;
(3) "Raw materials", materials intended for use to
produce construction materials, including, but not limited
to, sand, gravel, and rock.
2. Subject to the requirements specified in this
section, vehicles transporting construction materials from
the site of their production to the site of a construction

SB 942 2
project at which the materials will be used, or transporting
raw materials from their point of origin to a site at which
construction materials are produced, may exceed the weight
limits specified in section 304.180 by up to ten percent,
provided that the vehicle is properly maintained and
equipped to operate at the excess weight safely, and does
not exceed the gross vehicle weight rating for the vehicle
as specified by the vehicle's manufacturer.
3. This section shall not apply with regard to the
interstate system.
4. No vehicle operated at an excess weight in
accordance with this section shall be operated on any bridge
or other structure with a posted weight limit lower than the
vehicle's gross vehicle weight.
5. No vehicle operated at an excess weight in
accordance with this section shall be operated on any bridge
or other structure with any posted weight limit at a speed
greater than thirty miles per hour.
✓